Oklahoma, session 2025, SB555.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-170 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 9 Page 1


A. There is hereby created the Education Regulatory Sandbox


Program to exempt a school district from a specific education-


related statutory requirement within Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes or an administrative rule promulgated by the State Board of


Education. An exemption from federal education requirements shall


not be granted. A school district granted an exemption pursuant to


this subsection shall implement an innovation that is intended to


improve the educational outcomes for students enrolled in the


district. An exemption shall be granted for a three-year period and


may be renewed by the State Board of Education.


B. 1. A school district seeking to participate in the


Education Regulatory Sandbox Program shall apply to the State


Department of Education in the manner and on a form prescribed by


the Department.


2. The application shall include:


a. the specific education-related statutory requirement


within Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes or


administrative rule promulgated by the State Board of


Education from which the district seeks an exemption,


b. the innovation the school district seeks to implement,


and


c. the improved educational outcome sought and the


metrics to be used to measure the improvement.



Req. No. 9 Page 2


C. After an initial review of the application submitted


pursuant to subsection B of this section, representatives of the


State Department of Education shall meet with representatives of the


applying school district to discuss the application. Department


representatives shall make recommendations to the State Board of


Education for approval or disapproval of the applications submitted


pursuant to subsection B of this section. The Board shall approve


or disapprove the applications.


D. School districts granted exemptions pursuant to this section


shall electronically submit annual progress reports to the State


Department of Education.


E. A school district granted a three-year exemption pursuant to


this section may submit an application for a three-year renewal of


the exemption. The State Board of Education shall not approve a


renewal application if a school district’s annual progress reports


submitted pursuant to subsection D of this section do not show


evidence of the educational outcome improvement sought in the


district’s initial application.


F. Three years after implementation of the Education Regulatory


Sandbox Program, the State Department of Education shall collect


information from school districts that receive exemptions pursuant


to this section. The Department shall electronically submit a


report to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and


the Speaker of the House of Representatives that includes the school

Req. No. 9 Page 3


district exemption recipients, the innovation that each successful


applicant implemented, and the impact the innovation had on the


school district recipient, its students, and its staff.


G. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules to


implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-9 EB 1/19/2025 5:38:39 AM

























Req. No. 9 Page 4